src/morphology/affixes/pronouns.lexc
LEXICON _KUDO-Indef_Pronouns-Cases
+Pl+Nom+Indef:%>тЬ2 Indef_Pronouns-K ; 

+Ela:%>ст%{оэØ%} Indef_Pronouns-K ;
+Ine:%>с%{оэØ%} Indef_Pronouns-K ;
+Ill:%>с Indef_Pronouns-K ;
+Dat:%>нень Indef_Pronouns-K ;
+Abe:%>втО1мО1 Indef_Pronouns-K ;
+Abl:%>дО1 Indef_Pronouns-K ;
+Ela+Gen:%>ст%{оэØ%}%>нь Indef_Pronouns-K ;
+Abl+Gen:%>дО1%>нь Indef_Pronouns-K ;
+Ine+Gen:%>с%{оэØ%}%>нь Indef_Pronouns-K ;
+Gen:%>нь Indef_Pronouns-K ;
!2009-09-29!+Ine:%>с%{оэØ%} _KUDO-Tenses1 ;
+Ill:%>з%{оэØ%} Indef_Pronouns-K ;
+Ill:%>з%{оэØ%}нь Indef_Pronouns-K ;

+Sg+Nom+Def:%>сь Indef_Pronouns-K ;
+Sg+Gen+Def:%>нть Indef_Pronouns-K ;
+Sg+Dat+Def:%>нтень Indef_Pronouns-K ;
+Pl+Nom+Def:%>тне Indef_Pronouns-K ;
+Pl+Gen+Def:%>тне%>нь Indef_Pronouns-K ;
+Pl+Abl+Def:%>тне%>дО1 Indef_Pronouns-K ;
+Pl+Dat+Def:%>тне%>нень Indef_Pronouns-K ;
+Pl+Ine+Def:%>тне%>с%{оэØ%} Indef_Pronouns-K ;
+Pl+Ela+Def:%>тне%>ст%{оэØ%} Indef_Pronouns-K ;
+Pl+Ill+Def:%>тне%>с Indef_Pronouns-K ;

+Pl+Nom+PxPl1:%>нО1к Indef_Pronouns-K ;
+Pl+Nom+PxPl2:%>нк Indef_Pronouns-K ;
+Pl+Nom+PxPl3:%>ст Indef_Pronouns-K ;


LEXICON Indef_Pronouns-K
@R.INDEF.PREF@ Indef_Pronouns-K-pref ;
@D.INDEF.PREF@ Indef_Pronouns-K-post ;

LEXICON Indef_Pronouns-K-pref
! Removing +Clt tag, this is a derivation
: WORD-END ;

LEXICON Indef_Pronouns-K-post
! Removing +Clt tag, these derivations
+Der/бути:%-бути WORD-END ;
+Der/Гак:%>Г1ак WORD-END ;
!+Rel:  WORD-END ; 2017-03-11
!+Interr:  WORD-END ; 2017-03-11

LEXICON INDEF-IN-BUTI
:%-бути WORD-END ;

LEXICON INDEF-IN-GAK
:%>Г1ак WORD-END ;


LEXICON Dem-tona
+Dem+Adn: WORD-END ;
+Dem: Pron-Sg ;
+Dem: Pron-Pl ;

LEXICON Pron-Sg
+Pron+Sg+Nom+Indef: K ;
+Pron+Sg+Gen+Indef:%>нь K ;
+Pron+Sg+Dat+Indef:%>нень K ;
+Pron+Sg+Abl+Indef:%>дО1 K ;
+Pron+Sg+Ill+Indef:%>с K ;

+Pron+Sg+Nom+Def:%>сь K ;
+Pron+Sg+Gen+Def:%>нть K ;
+Pron+Sg+Dat+Def:%>нтень K ;
+Pron+Sg+Abl+Def:%>дО1%>нть K ;

LEXICON Pron-Pl
+Pron+Pl+Nom+Indef:%>тЬ2 K ;
+Pron+Pl+Gen+Indef:%>нь K ;
+Pron+Pl+Dat+Indef:%>нень K ;
+Pron+Pl+Abl+Indef:%>дО1 K ;
+Pron+Pl+Ill+Indef:%>с K ;

+Pron+Pl+Nom+Def:%>тне K ;
+Pron+Pl+Gen+Def:%>тне%>нь K ;
+Pron+Pl+Dat+Def:%>тне%>нень K ;
+Pron+Pl+Abl+Def:%>тне%>дО1 K ;
+Pron+Pl+Ill+Def:%>тне%>с K ;

!LEXICON Misc_Pronouns
!!се+Dem:се vese-QNT ;
!!секе+Dem+Pron:секе vese-QNT ; ! This also allows plural
!!сете+Dem+Pron:сете te-Dem ;
!!те+Dem:те te-Dem ;
!!тевате+Dem:тевате te-Dem ;

!севате+Dem+Pron:севате te-Dem ;
!тете+Dem:тете te-Dem ;
!
!те+Dem+Pron+Gen+Abl:тенде K ;
!те+Dem+Pron+Gen+Abe+Err/Orth+Dial:тенстеме K ;
!
!!истямо+Adn:истям Misc_Pronouns1 ;
!кона+Pron:кона Misc_Pronouns1 ;
!коната+Pron:коната Misc_Pronouns1 ;
!нона+Dem+Pron:нона Misc_Pronouns_Pl ;
!тона+Dem+Pron:тона Misc_Pronouns1 ;
!тоната+Dem+Pron:тоната Misc_Pronouns1 ;
!! мезе+Pron:мезИ2 Misc_Pronouns1 ;
!! мезе+Pron+Rel+Gen:мень K ;
!! ки+Pron+Interr:ки Misc_Pronouns1 ;
!!не+Dem:не ne-Misc_Pronouns1 ;
!!неке+Dem+Pron:неке ne-Misc_Pronouns1 ;
!!нете+Dem+Pron:нете Misc_Pronouns1 ;

LEXICON PRON-SPAT-ELA_4-PX !!= * __@CODE@__ эйстэ-
+Pron+Spat+Ela: POSSX4-END ;

LEXICON PRON-SPAT-ILL_4-PX !!= * __@CODE@__ эйзэ-
+Pron+Spat+Ill: POSSX4-END ;

LEXICON PRON-SPAT-INE_4-PX !!= * __@CODE@__ эйсэ-
+Pron+Spat+Ine: POSSX4-END ;

LEXICON PRON-SPAT-PRL_4-PX !!= * __@CODE@__ эзга-
+Pron+Spat+Prl: POSSX4-END ;


! ============================= !
!  Person morphological lexica !
! ============================= !



!! Some pronoun continuation have been moved here
!! Out of TestLexc-noun.txt

!LEXICON Misc_Pronouns1
! Misc_Pronouns_Sg ;
! Misc_Pronouns_Pl ;
!+Adn: WORD-END ;
! PossPX1-NomSg ; !2012-08-09 Removing NomGen
!+Gen: PossPX1 ; !2012-08-09 Removing NomGen

LEXICON PRON-DEM_TE
+Pron+Dem+Sg+Nom+Indef: K ;
+Pron+Dem+Sg+Abl+Indef:%>де K ;
+Pron+Dem+Sg+Abl+Def:%>денть K ;
+Pron+Dem+Sg+Gen+Indef:%>нь K ;
+Pron+Dem+Sg+Ine+Indef:%>ньсэ K ;
+Pron+Dem+Sg+Ill+Indef:%>ньс K ;
+Pron+Dem+Sg+Ela+Indef:%>ньстэ K ;

LEXICON PRON-DEM_TEKE
+Pron+Dem: _KUDO-Misc_Pronouns_Sg ;

LEXICON PRON-DEM_VASENCE
+Pron+Det+Ord: _KUDO-Misc_Pronouns_Sg ;

LEXICON DET_VASENCE
+Det+Ord: _KUDO-Misc_Pronouns_Sg ;

!LEXICON PRON-DEM_KUDO !!= * __@CODE@__ алце
!+Pron+Dem: NMN_KUDO ;


LEXICON te-Dem
+Pron: _KUDO-Misc_Pronouns_Sg ;
+Adn: WORD-END ;

!Formerly ne-Misc_Pronouns1
LEXICON ne-Dem
+Dem+Pron: Misc_Pronouns_Pl ;
+Dem+Adn: WORD-END ;

LEXICON PRON_KUDO
+Pron+Qnt: NMN_KUDO ;

!LEXICON Misc_Pronouns_Sg
!  Misc_Pronouns_Indef ;
!+Sg+Nom+Def:%>сь  _OSH-Tenses1_Prep-SG ;
!+Sg+Gen+Def:%>нть K ;
!+Sg+Def+Dat:%>нтень K ;
!+Sg+Prl+Def:%>Г2а _KUDO-SgDet-PossPx ;
!+Sg+Abe+Def:%>втО1мО1 _KUDO-SgDet-PossPx ;
!+Sg+Abl+Def:%>дО1 _KUDO-SgDet-PossPx ;
!+Sg+Tra+Def:%>кс _OSH-SgDet-PossPx ;
!+Sg+Ine+Def:%>с%{оэØ%} _KUDO-SgDet-PossPx ;
!+Sg+Ela+Def:%>ст%{оэØ%} _KUDO-SgDet-PossPx ;
!+Sg+Cmpr+Def:%>шка _KUDO-SgDet-PossPx ;
!+Sg+Tra+Def:%>V1кс _OSH-SgDet-PossPx ;

LEXICON _KUDO-Misc_Pronouns_Sg
  _KUDO-Misc_Pronouns_Indef ;
+Sg+Def+Nom:%>сь  _OSH-Tenses1_Prep-SG ;
+Sg+Def+Gen:%>нть K ;
+Sg+Def+Dat:%>нтень K ;
+Sg+Prl+Def:%>Г2а _KUDO-SgDet-PossPx ;
+Sg+Abe+Def:%>втО1мО1 _KUDO-SgDet-PossPx ;
+Sg+Abl+Def:%>дО1 _KUDO-SgDet-PossPx ;
+Sg+Tra+Def:%>кс _OSH-SgDet-PossPx ;
+Sg+Ine+Def:%>с%{оэØ%} _KUDO-SgDet-PossPx ;
+Sg+Ela+Def:%>ст%{оэØ%} _KUDO-SgDet-PossPx ;
+Sg+Cmpr+Def:%>шка _KUDO-SgDet-PossPx ;
+Sg+Tra+Def:%>кс _OSH-SgDet-PossPx ;


!LEXICON SgDet-PossPx
! PossPX1 ;
!+Sg+Def:%>нть K ; 

LEXICON _OSH-SgDet-PossPx
 _OSH-PossPX1 ;
+Sg+Def:%>нть K ; 

LEXICON _KUDO-SgDet-PossPx
     +PxSg100@U.PossPx.Sg1@:%>нЬ2@U.PossPx.Sg1@  _KAL-SecondaryDeclination ;
+Err/Orth+Dial+PxSg1@U.PossPx.Sg1@:%>м0@U.PossPx.Sg1@    _KAL-SecondaryDeclination ;
     +PxSg200@U.PossPx.Sg2@:%>тЬ2@U.PossPx.Sg2@  _KIT-SecondaryDeclination ;
+Err/Orth+Dial+PxSg20@U.PossPx.Sg2@:%>нтЬ2@U.PossPx.Sg2@ _KIT-SecondaryDeclination ;
     +PxSg3000@U.PossPx.Sg3@:%>нз%{оэØ%}@U.PossPx.Sg3@ _KUDO-SecondaryDeclination ;
     +PxPl1000@U.PossPx.Pl1@:%>нО1к@U.PossPx.Pl1@ _LAK-SecondaryDeclination ;
     +PxPl200@U.PossPx.Pl2@:%>нк@U.PossPx.Pl2@   _LAK-SecondaryDeclination ;
     +PxPl300@U.PossPx.Pl3@:%>ст@U.PossPx.Pl3@   _KIT-SecondaryDeclination ;
+Err/Orth+Dial+PxPl30@U.PossPx.Pl3@:%>нст@U.PossPx.Pl3@  _KIT-SecondaryDeclination ;
                  +Sg+Def:%>нть  K ;

!LEXICON Misc_Pronouns_Indef
!+Sg+Nom+Indef:  Tenses1_Prep-SG ;
!+Abl+Indef:%>дО1 K ;
!+Gen+Indef:%>нь _KAL-Tenses1 ; 
!+Dat+Indef:%>нень K ;
!+Ill+Indef:%>с K ;
!+Gen+Indef+Abl+Indef:%>нь%>стэ K ;
!+Gen+Indef+Ela+Indef:%>нь%>стэ K ;
!+Gen+Indef+Ine+Indef:%>нь%>сэ K ;
!+Gen+Indef+Ill+Indef:%>нь%>с K ; 
!+Gen+Indef+Abe+Indef:%>нь%>втО1мО1 K ;
!+Ine+Indef:%>с%{оэØ%} K ; 
!+Ela+Indef:%>ст%{оэØ%} K ;
!+Prl+Indef:%>Г2а K ;
!+Abe+Indef:%>втО1мО1 K ;
!+Tra+Indef:%>ксЬ2 K ;
!+Cmpr+Indef:%>шка K ; 


LEXICON _KUDO-Misc_Pronouns_Indef
+Sg+Nom+Indef:0  _KUDO-Tenses1_Prep-SG ;
+Abl+Indef:%>дО1 K ;
+Gen+Indef:%>нь _KAL-Tenses1 ; 
+Dat+Indef:%>нень K ;
+Ill+Indef:%>с K ;
+Gen+Indef+Abl+Indef:%>нь%>стэ K ;
+Gen+Indef+Ela+Indef:%>нь%>стэ K ;
+Gen+Indef+Ine+Indef:%>нь%>сэ K ;
+Gen+Indef+Ill+Indef:%>нь%>с K ; 
+Gen+Indef+Abe+Indef:%>нь%>втО1мО1 K ;
+Ine+Indef:%>с%{оэØ%} K ; 
+Ela+Indef:%>ст%{оэØ%} K ;
+Prl+Indef:%>Г2а K ;
+Abe+Indef:%>втО1мО1 K ;
+Tra+Indef:%>ксЬ2 K ; !!2013-04-15 What is this
+Cmpr+Indef:%>шка K ; 


LEXICON Misc_Pronouns_Pl
+Pl+Nom+Indef:%>тЬ2 K ;
+Pl+Nom+Def:%>тнЕ3 K ; 
+Pl+Abl+Def:%>тнЕ3%>де K ;
+Pl+Abe+Def:%>тнЕ3%>с K ;
+Pl+Cmpr+Def:%>тнЕ3%>шка K ;
+Pl+Gen+Def:%>тнЕ3%>нь K ;
+Pl+Dat+Def:%>тнЕ3%>нень K ;
+Pl+Ill+Def:%>тнЕ3%>с K ;
+Pl+Ine+Def:%>тнЕ3%>сэ K ;
+Pl+Ela+Def:%>тнЕ3%>стэ K ;
+Pl+Tra+Def:%>тнЕ3%>кс K ;
+Pl+Prl+Def:%>тнЕ3%>ва K ;

!! DEMONSTRATIVE DERIVATION !!
LEXICON N2Dem-SE
+Der/се+Der/MWN+N:се _KUDO-N2-Def-Declension ;
