src/morphology/stems/pronouns.lexc
эйсэнзэ:эйсэ PRON-SPAT-INE_4-PX  "" ;
эйстэнзэ:эйстэ PRON-SPAT-ELA_4-PX  "" ;
эйзэнзэ:эйз PRON-SPAT-ILL_4-PX  "" ;
эзганзо:эзга PRON-SPAT-PRL_4-PX  "" ;
теке:теке PRON-DEM_TEKE  "juuri tämä" ;
те:те PRON-DEM_TE  "tämä" ;
тевате:тевате PRON-DEM_TE  "" ;
васенце:васенце PRON-DEM_VASENCE  "ensimmäinen" ;
эрьва:эрьва PRON_KUDO  "jokainen" ;
